Utah statutes.
76-6-401.   Definitions.

For the purposes of this part:

(1)  "Property" means anything of value, including real estate, tangible and intangible personal property, captured or domestic animals and birds, written instruments or other writings representing or embodying rights concerning real or personal property, labor, services, or otherwise containing anything of value to the owner, commodities of a public utility nature such as telecommunications, gas, electricity, steam, or water, and trade secrets, meaning the whole or any portion of any scientific or technical information, design, process, procedure, formula or invention which the owner thereof intends to be available only to persons selected by him.

(2)  "Obtain" means, in relation to property, to bring about a transfer of possession or of some other legally recognized interest in property, whether to the obtainer or another; in relation to labor or services, to secure performance thereof; and in relation to a trade secret, to make any facsimile, replica, photograph, or other reproduction.

(3)  "Purpose to deprive" means to have the conscious object:

(a)  To withhold property permanently or for so extended a period or to use under such circumstances that a substantial portion of its economic value, or of the use and benefit thereof, would be lost; or

(b)  To restore the property only upon payment of a reward or other compensation; or

(c)  To dispose of the property under circumstances that make it unlikely that the owner will recover it.

(4)  "Obtain or exercise unauthorized control" means, but is not necessarily limited to, conduct heretofore defined or known as common-law larceny by trespassory taking, larceny by conversion, larceny by bailee, and embezzlement.

(5)  "Deception" occurs when a person intentionally:

(a)  Creates or confirms by words or conduct an impression of law or fact that is false and that the actor does not believe to be true and that is likely to affect the judgment of another in the transaction; or

(b)  Fails to correct a false impression of law or fact that the actor previously created or confirmed by words or conduct that is likely to affect the judgment of another and that the actor does not now believe to be true; or

(c)  Prevents another from acquiring information likely to affect his judgment in the transaction; or

(d)  Sells or otherwise transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien, security interest, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the property, whether the lien, security interest, claim, or impediment is or is not valid or is or is not a matter of official record; or

(e)  Promises performance that is likely to affect the judgment of another in the transaction, which performance the actor does not intend to perform or knows will not be performed; provided, however, that failure to perform the promise in issue without other evidence of intent or knowledge is not sufficient proof that the actor did not intend to perform or knew the promise would not be performed.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

